ja: 円周調整メカニズム: 固定 (調整不可); フリクションフィット; レバー/クイックリリース; ネジ/ノブロック; ピン穴付きスライドアーム; その他
pl: Mechanizm regulacji obwodu: Stały (bez regulacji); Na wcisk; Dźwignia / szybkozłączka; Blokada na śrubę / pokrętło; Ramię przesuwne z otworami na piny; Inny
el: Μηχανισμός ρύθμισης περιφέρειας: Σταθερός (μη ρυθμιζόμενος); Εφαρμογή με τριβή; Μοχλός/ταχεία απελευθέρωση; Κλείδωμα με βίδα/λαβή; Συρόμενος βραχίονας με οπές για πείρο; Άλλος
en: Circumference adjustment mechanism: Fixed (non-adjustable); Friction fit; Lever/quick-release; Screw/knob lock; Sliding arm with pin holes; Other
sv: Mekanism för justering av omkrets: Fast (ej justerbar); Friktionspassning; Spak/snabbkoppling; Skruv-/vredlås; Skjutarm med stifthål; Annan
cs: Mechanismus pro nastavení obvodu: Pevný (nenastavitelný); Třecí spoj; Páčka / rychloupínák; Zámek na šroub/kolečko; Posuvné rameno s otvory pro čepy; Jiné
nl: Omtrekaanpassing mechanisme: Vast (niet-verstelbaar); Wrijvingspassing; Hendel/snelsluiting; Schroef-/knopvergrendeling; Schuifarm met pengaten; Anders
nb: Mekanisme for justering av omkrets: Fast (ikke-justerbar); Friksjonspassform; Spak / hurtigutløser; Skrue-/knottlås; Glidearm med pinnehull; Annen
hr-HR: Mehanizam za podešavanje opsega: Fiksno (nepodesivo); Frikcijsko prianjanje; Poluga / brzo otpuštanje; Zaključavanje vijkom/gumbom; Klizna ruka s rupama za klinove; Ostalo
ko: 둘레 조절 방식: 고정형(조절 불가); 마찰 맞춤; 레버/퀵 릴리스; 나사/노브 잠금; 핀 구멍이 있는 슬라이딩 암; 기타
zh-CN: 周长调节机制: 固定（不可调节）; 摩擦配合; 拨杆/快拆; 螺钉/旋钮锁; 带销孔的滑动臂; 其他
sk-SK: Mechanizmus nastavenia obvodu: Pevný (nenastaviteľný); Trecie upevnenie; Páčka/rýchloupínač; Zámok so skrutkou/gombíkom; Posuvné rameno s otvormi na čapy; Iné
th: กลไกปรับเส้นรอบวง: คงที่ (ปรับไม่ได้); แบบสวมฝืด; คันโยก/ปลดเร็ว; ล็อกด้วยสกรู/ปุ่มหมุน; แขนเลื่อนพร้อมรูสลัก; อื่นๆ
fi: Ympärysmitan säätömekanismi: Kiinteä (ei säädettävä); Kitkasovite; Vipu/pikalukitus; Ruuvi/nuppilukitus; Liukuvarsi tappirei'illä; Muu
ro-RO: Mecanism de ajustare a circumferinței: Fix (neajustabil); Fixare prin frecare; Pârghie/eliberare rapidă; Blocare cu șurub/buton; Braț glisant cu orificii pentru pini; Altele
de: Umfangverstellmechanismus: Fest (nicht verstellbar); Reibungspassung; Hebel/Schnellverschluss; Schraub-/Drehverschluss; Gleitarm mit Stiftlöchern; Sonstige
zh-TW: 周長調整機制: 固定 (不可調); 摩擦貼合; 撥桿/快拆; 螺絲/旋鈕鎖定; 帶銷孔滑臂; 其他
bg-BG: Механизъм за регулиране на обиколката: Фиксиран (нерегулируем); Чрез триене; Лост/бързо освобождаване; Заключване с винт/копче; Плъзгащо се рамо с отвори за щифтове; Друго
pt-PT: Mecanismo de ajuste da circunferência: Fixo (não ajustável); Encaixe por fricção; Alavanca/desengate rápido; Bloqueio por parafuso/botão; Braço deslizante com orifícios para pinos; Outro
tr: Çevre ayarlama mekanizması: Sabit (ayarlanamaz); Sıkı geçme; Kollu/hızlı açılan; Vida/düğme kilidi; Pimli kayar kol; Diğer
es: Mecanismo de ajuste de la circunferencia: Fijo (no ajustable); Ajuste por fricción; Palanca/liberación rápida; Bloqueo por tornillo/perilla; Brazo deslizante con orificios; Otro
ru: Механизм регулировки окружности: Фиксированный (нерегулируемый); Фрикционная фиксация; Рычажный / быстросъемный; Винтовой / поворотный замок; Раздвижной кронштейн с отверстиями для штифтов; Другой
pt-BR: Mecanismo de ajuste de circunferência: Fixo (não ajustável); Encaixe por fricção; Alavanca/liberação rápida; Trava de parafuso/botão; Braço deslizante com furos para pinos; Outro
lt-LT: Apimties reguliavimo mechanizmas: Fiksuotas (nereguliuojamas); Trinties fiksatorius; Svirtis / greitas atleidimas; Varžtas / rankenėlė; Slankiojanti svirtis su fiksavimo angomis; Kita
da: Mekanisme til justering af omkreds: Fast (ikke-justerbar); Friktionstilpasning; Håndtag/hurtigudløser; Skrue-/drejeknoplås; Glidearm med stifthuller; Andet
sl-SI: Mehanizem za nastavitev obsega: Fiksno (nenastavljivo); Torno prileganje; Ročica/hitra sprostitev; Zaklep z vijakom/gumbom; Drsna roka z luknjami za zatiče; Drugo
fr: Mécanisme de réglage de la circonférence: Fixe (non ajustable); Ajustement par friction; Levier/attache rapide; Verrouillage à vis/molette; Bras coulissant avec trous de goupille; Autre
vi: Cơ chế điều chỉnh chu vi: Cố định (không thể điều chỉnh); Lắp ghép bằng ma sát; Đòn bẩy/nhả nhanh; Khóa vít/núm xoay; Cần trượt có lỗ chốt; Khác
hu: Kerületbeállító mechanizmus: Rögzített (nem állítható); Súrlódásos rögzítés; Karos/gyorskioldós; Csavaros/forgógombos zár; Csúszókaros, furatos; Egyéb
it: Meccanismo di regolazione della circonferenza: Fisso (non regolabile); Ad attrito; Leva/Sgancio rapido; Blocco a vite/manopola; Braccio scorrevole con fori per perni; Altro